dev/ortho/ara-cyr.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%> 


LEXICON Root 

AlphaOne ; 
ئ:0 AlphaOne ;

Punct ; 
!Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
!Punct ; 
# ;

LEXICON AlphaOne

ا:а AlphaLoop ;
ە:ә AlphaLoop ;
ب:б AlphaLoop ;
پ:п AlphaLoop ;
ت:т AlphaLoop ;
ج:ж AlphaLoop ;
چ:ч AlphaLoop ;
خ:х AlphaLoop ;
د:д AlphaLoop ;
ر:р AlphaLoop ;
ز:з AlphaLoop ;
ژ:з AlphaLoop ;
س:с AlphaLoop ;
ش:ш AlphaLoop ;
غ:ғ AlphaLoop ;
ف:ф AlphaLoop ;
ق:қ AlphaLoop ;
ك:к AlphaLoop ;
گ:г AlphaLoop ;
ڭ:ң AlphaLoop ;
ل:л AlphaLoop ;
م:м AlphaLoop ;
ن:н AlphaLoop ;
ھ:һ AlphaLoop ;
و:о AlphaLoop ;
ۇ:у AlphaLoop ;
ۆ:ө AlphaLoop ;
ۈ:ү AlphaLoop ;
ۋ:в AlphaLoop ;
ې:е AlphaLoop ;
!ې:э AlphaLoop ;
ى:и AlphaLoop ;
ي:й AlphaLoop ;
ک:к AlphaLoop ;

ا:А AlphaLoop ;
ە:Ә AlphaLoop ;
ب:Б AlphaLoop ;
پ:П AlphaLoop ;
ت:Т AlphaLoop ;
ج:Ж AlphaLoop ;
چ:Ч AlphaLoop ;
خ:Х AlphaLoop ;
د:Д AlphaLoop ;
ر:Р AlphaLoop ;
ز:З AlphaLoop ;
ژ:З AlphaLoop ;
س:С AlphaLoop ;
ش:Ш AlphaLoop ;
غ:Ғ AlphaLoop ;
ف:Ф AlphaLoop ;
ق:Қ AlphaLoop ;
ك:К AlphaLoop ;
گ:Г AlphaLoop ;
ڭ:Ң AlphaLoop ;
ل:Л AlphaLoop ;
م:М AlphaLoop ;
ن:Н AlphaLoop ;
ھ:Һ AlphaLoop ;
و:О AlphaLoop ;
ۇ:У AlphaLoop ;
ۆ:Ө AlphaLoop ;
ۈ:Ү AlphaLoop ;
ۋ:В AlphaLoop ;
ې:У AlphaLoop ;
!ې:э AlphaLoop ;
ى:И AlphaLoop ;
ي:Й AlphaLoop ;
ک:К AlphaLoop ;

LEXICON Alpha

ا:а AlphaLoop ;
ە:ә AlphaLoop ;
ب:б AlphaLoop ;
پ:п AlphaLoop ;
ت:т AlphaLoop ;
ج:ж AlphaLoop ;
چ:ч AlphaLoop ;
خ:х AlphaLoop ;
د:д AlphaLoop ;
ر:р AlphaLoop ;
ز:з AlphaLoop ;
ژ:з AlphaLoop ;
س:с AlphaLoop ;
ش:ш AlphaLoop ;
غ:ғ AlphaLoop ;
ف:ф AlphaLoop ;
ق:қ AlphaLoop ;
ك:к AlphaLoop ;
گ:г AlphaLoop ;
ڭ:ң AlphaLoop ;
ل:л AlphaLoop ;
م:м AlphaLoop ;
ن:н AlphaLoop ;
ھ:һ AlphaLoop ;
و:о AlphaLoop ;
ۇ:у AlphaLoop ;
ۆ:ө AlphaLoop ;
ۈ:ү AlphaLoop ;
ۋ:в AlphaLoop ;
ې:е AlphaLoop ;
!ې:э AlphaLoop ;
ى:и AlphaLoop ;
ي:й AlphaLoop ;
ک:к AlphaLoop ;

# ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
!%,:%، # ;  ! Arabic comma
!،:، # ;
!,:، # ;
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
